Louisiana, session 2026, HB1069.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:2(38) and (39) and 82.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the respective
meanings ascribed to them in this Section, unless a different meaning clearly appears
from the context:
* * *
(38) "Distilling facility" means the licensed premises of a manufacturing
distillery where liquor is manufactured for the primary purpose of selling the
finished product for resale and that is authorized to sell or serve to the public liquor
manufactured at the facility for consumption on or off the licensed premises of a
manufacturer as defined in this Section.
(39) "Premises", "licensed premises" or "premises to be licensed" means the
building or that part of the building as defined in the application for the permit in
which alcoholic beverages having an alcoholic content of more than six percent by
volume are sold. Except when such beverages are regularly sold or served outside
the building, the terms also include the outside area of the building.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-913 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1069
§82.2. Transfer
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a distilling facility that
distills liquor at a distillery located entirely within this state and that holds an in-state
high alcohol manufacturer's permit may use a wholesaler, for a set fee, to transfer
liquor distilled at the distilling facility to another manufacturing distillery in this state
owned wholly by the distilling facility to sell or serve to the public for consumption
on or off the licensed premises if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The transferring distilling facility maintains no less than a five hundred
liter still, and the receiving distillery owned wholly by the transferring distilling
facility maintains no less than a one hundred liter still.
(2) The quantity of distilled liquor transferred is no greater than ten percent
of the total amount of liquor distilled monthly at the transferring distilling facility or
five hundred gallons.
(3) The quantity of distilled liquor transferred does not exceed an amount
greater than fifty percent of the receiving manufacturing distillery's production of
distilled liquor for the previous month.
(4) The receiving manufacturing distillery shall remit all state and parish or
municipal sales and excise taxes to the proper tax collecting authority for all products
received and sold to the public.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions provided in R.S. 26:2.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-913 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1069